dictsource/dbr_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Dobrudjan Tatar

// Vowels
.L01 a ı o u  // back vowels
.L02 e i ö ü  // front vowels
.L03 ĭ

// Consonants
.L04 b c ç d f g h j k l m n ñ p q r s ş t v w y z

.group a
        a        a
		a  (_   'a
		a  (L04_ 'a
		a  (L04L04_ 'a
		
.group b
        b        b
		bb       b:
		
.group c
        c        dZ
		cc       dZ:
		
.group ç
        ç        tS
		çç       tS:
		
.group d
        d        d
		dd       d:
		
.group e
        e        e
		e  (_   'e
		e  (L04_ 'e
		e  (L04L04_ 'e
		ee       e:
		ee (_   'e:
		ee (L04_ 'e:
		ee (L04L04_ 'e:
		
.group f
        f        f
		
.group g
        g        g
		gg       g:
        g  (L02  J
   L02) g  (K    g
        g  (L03  g
   L03) g  (K    g

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        i
        i  (_   'i
        i  (L04_ 'i
        i  (L04L04_ 'i

.group ĭ
        ĭ        I
        ĭ  (_   'I
        ĭ  (L04_ 'I
        ĭ  (L04L04_ 'I

.group ı
        ı        @
        ı  (_   '@
        ı  (L04_ '@
        ı  (L04L04_ '@
		
.group j
        j        Z

.group k
        k        k
        kk		 k:
		k  (L02  c
   L02) k  (K    k
        k  (L03  k
   L03) k  (K    k
   
.group l
        l        l
		l (L01   L
   L01) l (K     L
        l (L03   l
   L03) l (K     l
   
.group m
        m        m
		
.group n
        n        n
		nĭz (_   =nIz
		
.group ñ
        ñ        N
		ñız (_   =N@z
		
.group o
        o        o
		o  (_   'o
		o  (L04_ 'o
		o  (L04L04_ 'o
		
.group ö
        ö        W
		ö  (_   'W
		ö  (L04_ 'W
		ö  (L04L04_ 'W
		
.group p
        p        p
		pp       p:
		
.group q
        q        q
		qq       q:
		
.group r
        r        r
		
.group s
        s        s
	    sıñ (_   =s@N
		
.group ş
        ş        S
		
.group t
        t        t
		tt       t:
		
.group u
        u        u
		u  (_   'u
		u  (L04_ 'u
		u  (L04L04_ 'u
		
.group ü
        ü        y
		ü  (_   'y
		ü  (L04_ 'y
		ü  (L04L04_ 'y
		
.group v
        v        v
		
.group w
        w        w
		
.group y
        y        j
		
.group z
        z        z
